Maine, session 132, LD429.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1834 is enacted to read:
§1834. Collection of information regarding patient immigration status
1. Information collection. A hospital licensed under this chapter shall collect
information from a patient seeking care regarding that patient's immigration status.
2. Asylum seeker defined. For the purposes of this section, "asylum seeker" means an
individual who meets the definition of "refugee" in the United States Immigration and
Nationality Act, Section 101(a)(42) and who:
A. Has applied with the United States Department of Homeland Security, United States
Citizenship and Immigration Services for asylum using the affirmative asylum process;
B. Is subject to expedited removal proceedings and found to have a credible fear of
persecution or torture; or
C. Has been placed in removal proceedings and is asserting asylum as a defense against
removal.
3. Required assurances. At the time a hospital requests information from a patient
regarding the patient's immigration status, the hospital shall inform the patient that the
patient is not required to provide this information and that declining to provide this
information does not preclude a patient from receiving medical care. The hospital shall also
inform the patient that the patient's immigration status does not affect the patient's ability
to receive medical care at the hospital.
4. Data reporting. A hospital licensed under this chapter shall, by January 1, 2027 and
on a quarterly basis thereafter, submit a report to the department providing the aggregate
cost of medical care provided to patients who are asylum seekers.
5. Department report. The department shall, by March 1, 2027 and annually
thereafter, submit a report to the Governor and to the joint standing committee of the
Legislature having jurisdiction over health and human services matters providing
information on the aggregate cost of medical care provided to patients who are asylum
seekers.
6. Rulemaking. The department shall establish by rule guidelines necessary to carry
out the purposes of this section. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine
technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
7. Federal reimbursement. No later than July 1, 2027 and annually thereafter, the
department shall submit a written request to the United States Department of Health and
Human Services, Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services seeking reimbursement for
the aggregate cost of medical care provided to asylum seekers during the prior year.